Hawaii statutes.
§661-8 Interest. No interest shall be
allowed on any claim up to the time of the rendition of judgment thereon by the
court, unless upon a contract expressly stipulating for the payment of
interest, or upon a refund of a payment into the "litigated claims
fund" as provided by law. [L 1894-5, c 26, §8; RL 1925, §2676; RL 1935,
§4427; RL 1945, §10482; am L 1951, c 224, §4; RL 1955, §245-8; HRS §661-8]

Cross References

Litigated claims fund, see §§40-35 and 232-24.

Case Notes

Section does not preclude prejudgment interest where the
State is not involved. 51 H. 346, 461 P.2d 140 (1969).

As this section disallows prejudgment interest on claims
against the State, except in certain, identified instances, the State did not
waive its sovereign immunity from an award of prejudgment interest under this
section, and §478-2 did not contradict or supersede the limitation of the
State's obligation to pay prejudgment interest only upon a "contract
expressly stipulating for the payment of interest", the circuit court did
not err when it denied plaintiffs' request for prejudgment interest. 122 H.
150 (App.), 223 P.3d 215 (2009).

Mentioned: 654 F. Supp. 2d 1142 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next